Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 16

Office of Local Government

4-16-101. Creation — Functions and duties.

There is hereby created the office of local government to be located in the office of the comptroller of the treasury.

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

The office of local government has the following functions and duties:

Provide geographic information systems technical support, training, and map maintenance to the division of property assessments and local governments;

Assist local governments with geographic information systems and mapping issues;

Assist and advise local governments with local redistricting and reapportionment;

Compile and maintain precinct boundaries and maps in the state and assist with their development;

Serve as the liaison with the United States census bureau and participate in its redistricting data program;

Assist with other geographic information systems activities in the office of the comptroller of the treasury; and

Such other duties as may be assigned by the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1963, ch. 205, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-1601; Acts 1980, ch. 675, § 2; 2013, ch. 21, §§ 1, 3; 2019, ch. 100, § 1.

Cross-References. Commission on intergovernmental relations, title 4, ch. 10.

County election commissions to notify office of precinct boundary changes, §2-3-105.

4-16-102. Other state agencies unaffected.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to detract from the function, powers and duties legally assigned to any other agency of the state, nor to interrupt or preclude direct relationships by any such agency with local governments in carrying out its operations.

Acts 1963, ch. 205, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-1603.